Vermont, session 2025-2026, H878.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social Security
benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of
this chapter shall be as follows:
VT LEG #386323 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.878
2026 Page 2 of 6
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $55,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under the federal
Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $55,000.00 but less than $65,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act to be excluded shall be
proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income
over $55,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $65,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $65,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable benefits received
under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this section.
VT LEG #386323 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.878
2026 Page 3 of 6
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $70,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$70,000.00 but less than $80,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act to be excluded shall be
proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income
over $70,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $80,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this subdivision
(B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $80,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable benefits received
under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this section. [Repealed.]
* * *
(e)(1) Requirement to elect one exclusion. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for more than one of the exclusions under
VT LEG #386323 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.878
2026 Page 4 of 6
subsections (a), subsection (b), and or (c) of this section shall elect only one of
the exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible.
(2) A taxpayer of this State who is eligible during the taxable year for
the military retirement and survivor benefit exclusion under subsection (d) of
this section may elect that exclusion regardless of whether the taxpayer also
elects an exclusion under subsections (a)–(c) subsection (b) or (c) of this
section.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5811 is amended to read:
§ 5811. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
* * *
(iv) the portion of certain retirement income and federally taxable
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act that is required to be
excluded under section 5830e of this chapter and all federally taxable benefits
received under the Social Security Act;
VT LEG #386323 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.878
2026 Page 5 of 6
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
§ 5813. STATUTORY PURPOSES
* * *
(w) The statutory purpose of the partial exemption of federally taxable
benefits under the Social Security Act and certain retirement income in section
5830e of this title is to lessen the tax burden on Vermonters with low to
moderate income who derive part of their income from Social Security benefits
and certain retirement income.
* * *
(bb) The statutory purpose of the exemption of all federally taxable
benefits under the Social Security Act in subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this
title is to lessen the tax burden on Vermonters who derive part of their income
from Social Security benefits.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5402 is amended to read:
§ 5402. EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX LIABILITY
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the property
dollar equivalent yield and income dollar equivalent yield established under
this section and section 5402b of this chapter shall be calculated so that the
VT LEG #386323 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.878
2026 Page 6 of 6
average homestead property tax bill in Vermont increases by not more than
one percent over the previous year.
* * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this section, Secs. 1–3 (Social Security
income) shall take effect retroactively on January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable
years beginning on and after January 1, 2026.
(b) Sec. 4 (property tax cap) shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386323 v.1